Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201468-1916
Total resident days, defined.

Total resident
days means the total number of residents residing in the nursing facility
or skilled nursing facility between July 1 and June 30, multiplied by the
number of days each such resident resided in that nursing facility or skilled
nursing facility. If a resident is admitted and discharged on the same day,
the resident shall be considered to be a resident for that day.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 16.